apertium-swa.swa.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Swahili

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>     ! Noun
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<vblex%> ! Verb

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<sp%>  ! Singular or Plural

! Person morphology
%<p1%>  ! 1st person
%<p2%>  ! 2nd person
%<p3%>  ! 3rd person

! Verb tense and mood morphology
%<pres%>    ! Present tense
%<past%>    ! Unrelated distant past
%<per%>     ! Present Perfect
%<fut%>     ! Future
%<hab%>     ! Habitual

! Pronoun morpholgy
%<pers%>   ! Personal pronoun

! Noun-class morphology
%<cl1%>     ! Class 1 noun(m-wa)
%<cl3%>     ! Class 3 noun(m-mi)
%<cl5%>     ! Class 5 noun(ji-ma)
%<cl7%>     ! Class 7 noun(ki-vi)
%<cl9%>     ! Class 9 noun(n-n)
%<cl11%>    ! Class 11 noun(u-u)(u-zi)
%<cl14%>    ! Class 14 noun(u-u)(u-u)
%<cl15%>    ! Class 15 noun(ku-ku)
!%<cl16%>    ! Class 16 noun(pa-pa)
!%<cl17%>    ! Class 17 noun(mu-mu)
!%<cl18%>    ! Class 18 noun(ku-ku)

%[%+sg%]   ! Singular (noun prefix matching)
%[%+pl%]   ! Plural (noun prefix matching)
%[%+abs%]  ! Abstract (derived from non-abstract)
%[%+def%]  ! Definite (used w. plural)
%[%+inst%] ! Instantiation of abstract concept

%[%+p1%]   ! First person
%[%+p2%]   ! Second person
%[%+p3%]   ! Third person
%[%+aa%]   ! Animate (used w. verb)
%[%+nn%]   ! Inanimate (used w. verb)
%[%+fut%]  ! Future tense
%[%+pres%] ! Present tense
%[%+per%]  ! Perfect tense
%[%+past%] ! Past tense
%[%+hab%]  ! Habitual tense
%[%+ref%]  ! Reflexive
%[%+inf%]  ! Infinitive
%[%+imp%]  ! Imperative

%[%-p1%]   ! First person
%[%-p2%]   ! Second person
%[%-p3%]   ! Third person
%[%-aa%]   ! Animate (used w. verb)
%[%-nn%]   ! Inanimate (used w. verb)
%[%-fut%]  ! Future tense
%[%-pres%] ! Present tense
%[%-per%]  ! Perfect tense
%[%-past%] ! Past tense
%[%-hab%]  ! Habitual tense
%[%-ref%]  ! Reflexive
%[%-inf%]  ! Infinitive
%[%-imp%]  ! Imperative

%[%-sg%]   ! Singular (noun prefix matching)
%[%-pl%]   ! Plural (noun prefix matching)
%[%-abs%]  ! Abstract (derived from non-abstract)
%[%-def%]  ! Definite (used w. plural)
%[%-inst%] ! Instantiation of abstract concept

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%       ! Space
%-
%+

  
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
NounPrefix ;
Pronouns;
VerbPersonNum-Prefix;

LEXICON COMMON-Suffix
# ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Noun Morphotactics                                  !
!=============================================================================!


LEXICON NounPrefix
I-II ;
I-Irr;
III-IV ;
V-VI ;
VII-VIII ;
IX-X ;
XI ;
XIV ; 
!XV ;
!XVI ;
!XVII ;
!XVIII ;


LEXICON I-II
! TODO: prefix before vowel(mw)
%[%-sg%]:m%> I-II-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:wa%> I-II-Stems ;

LEXICON I-Irr
I-Irr-Stems ;

LEXICON III-IV
! TODO: prefix before vowel(mw)
%[%-sg%]:m%> III-IV-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:mi%> III-IV-Stems ;

LEXICON V-VI
! TODO: prefix before vowel(j)
!%[%-sg%]:ji%> V-VI-Stems ;
%[%-sg%]: V-VI-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ma%> V-VI-Stems ;

LEXICON VII-VIII
%[%-sg%]:ki%> VII-VIII-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:vi%> VII-VIII-Stems ;

LEXICON IX-X
! TODO: prefix before vowel(ny)
IX-X-Stems ;

LEXICON XI
%[%-sg%]: XI-Stems ;

LEXICON XIV
%[%-sg%]: XIV-Stems ;

!LEXICON XV
!%[%-sg%]:ku%> XV-Stems ;

!LEXICON XVI
!XVI-Stems ;

!LEXICON XVII
!XVII-Stems ;

!LEXICON XVIII
!XVIII-Stems ;


LEXICON I-II-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON I-Irr-Suffix
%<n%>%<cl1%>%<sp%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON III-IV-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON V-VI-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
!%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON VII-VIII-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON IX-X-Suffix
%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sp%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON XI-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON XIV-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl14%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON XV-Suffix
!%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl15%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON XVI-Suffix
!%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl16%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON XVII-Suffix
!%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl17%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON XVIII-Suffix
!%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl18%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;


!=============================================================================!
!                         Pronoun Morphotactics                               !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON PRON-Mimi
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-Sisi
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-Wewe
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-Nyi
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-Yeye
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-Wao
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON VerbPersonNum-Prefix
%[%-p1%]%[%-sg%]:ni%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-sg%]:u%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]:a%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-pl%]:tu%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-pl%]:m%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-pl%]:wa%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:ni%> V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem ;


LEXICON V-TAM-REL-OBJ-Stem
V-Stems;
V-TAM-Prefix;

LEXICON V-TAM-Prefix
%[%-pres%]:na%> V-Stems ;
%[%-fut%]:ta%> V-Stems ;
%[%-per%]:me%> V-Stems ;
%[%-past%]:li%> V-Stems ;
%[%-hab%]:hu%> V-Stems ;

LEXICON V-Suffix
!TODO: create new sections(when adding subjunctive)
%[%+pres%]%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pres%]%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pres%]%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pres%]%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pres%]%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pres%]%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;

%[%+fut%]%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+fut%]%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<fut%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+fut%]%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+fut%]%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+fut%]%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<fut%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+fut%]%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;

%[%+per%]%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<per%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+per%]%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<per%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+per%]%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%<per%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+per%]%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<per%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+per%]%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<per%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+per%]%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%<per%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;

%[%+past%]%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+past%]%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+past%]%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+past%]%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+past%]%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+past%]%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;

%[%+hab%]%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<hab%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+hab%]%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<hab%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+hab%]%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%<hab%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+hab%]%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<hab%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+hab%]%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<hab%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+hab%]%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%<hab%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Nouns

LEXICON I-II-Stems
mtu:tu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Person"
mtoto:toto I-II-Suffix ; ! "Child"
mkulima:kulima I-II-Suffix ; ! "Farmer"
mke:ke I-II-Suffix ; ! "Wife"
msichana:sichana I-II-Suffix ; ! "Girl"
mvulana:vulana I-II-Suffix ; ! "Boy"
mgeni:geni I-II-Suffix ; ! "Visitor"
mfaransa:faransa I-II-Suffix ; ! "French person"
mjomba:jomba I-II-Suffix ; ! "Uncle"
mpishi:pishi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Cook"
mzee:zee I-II-Suffix ; ! "Elder"
mzungu:zungu I-II-Suffix ; ! "White man"
mjerumani:jerumani I-II-Suffix ; ! "German"
mnyama:nyama I-II-Suffix ; ! "Animal"

! prefix changes because of vowel
!mwanamume:naume I-II-Suffix ; ! "Man"
!mwanamke:nawake I-II-Suffix ; ! "Woman"
!mwalimu:limu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Teacher"
!mwanafunzi:nafunzi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Student"
!mwafrika:afrika I-II-Suffix ; ! "African"

LEXICON I-Irr-Stems
baba:baba I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Father"
mama:mama I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Mother"
dada:dada I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Sister"
kaka:kaka I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Brother"
nyanya:nyanya I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Grandmother"
rafiki:rafiki I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Friend"
shangazi:shangazi I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Aunt" 
kipofu:kipofu I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Blind(person)"
kiziwi:kiziwi I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Deaf(person)"
mbwa:mbwa I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Dog"
paka:paka I-Irr-Suffix ; ! "Cat"

LEXICON III-IV-Stems
mti:ti III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Tree"
mnazi:nazi III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Coconut tree"
mtofaa:tofaa III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Apple tree"
mgomba:gomba III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Banana tree"
mdomo:domo III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Mouth"
mkono:kono III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Hand"
moyo:oyo III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Heart"
mchezo:chezo III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Game"
mwaka:aka III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Year"
ndege:ndege III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Bird"

LEXICON V-VI-Stems
blanketi:blanketi V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Blanket"
gari:gari V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Car"
dirisha:dirisha V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Window"
gazeti:gazeti V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Newspaper"
neno:neno V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Word"
shamba:shamba V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Farm"
jina:jina V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Name"
juma:juma V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Week"
swali:swali V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Question"
jibu:jibu V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Answer"


LEXICON VII-VIII-Stems
kiti:ti VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Chair"
kisu:su VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Knife"
kilima:lima VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Hill"
kichwa:chwa VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Head"
kidole:dole VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Finger"

! nouns that with [ch-vy]
!chakula:akula VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Food"
!chuo:uo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "School"
!choo:oo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Restroom"
!chumba:umba VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Room"
!chama:ama VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Party"
!chombo:ombo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Container"
!cheo:eo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Rank"


LEXICON IX-X-Stems
chupa:chupa IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Bottle"
chai:chai IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Tea"
chumvi:chumvi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Salt"
ajali:ajali IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Accident"
ardhi:ardhi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Earth/Ground"
bahari:bahari IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Sea"
barua:barua IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Letter"
nyumba:nyumba IX-X-Suffix ; ! "House" 
meza:meza IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Chair"

LEXICON XI-Stems
! create necessary subcategories
!u-ny
uso:nyuso XI-Suffix ; ! "Faces"
uzi:nyuzi XI-Suffix ; ! "Thread"

! u-mb
ulimi:ndimi XI-Suffix ; ! "Tongue"
udevu:ndevu XI-Suffix ; ! "Beard"

!u-|
unywele:nywele XI-Suffix ; ! "Hair strand"
ufunguo:funguo XI-Suffix ; !  "Key"

LEXICON XIV-Stems
udongo:udongo XIV-Suffix ; ! "Soil/Ground"
ugali:ugali XIV-Suffix ; ! "Corn paste"
ulimwengu:ulimwengu XIV-Suffix ; ! "World"
umeme:umeme XIV-Suffix ; ! "Electricity"
umri:umri XIV-Suffix ; ! "Age"
usingizi:usingizi XIV-Suffix ; ! "Sleep"

!LEXICON XV-Stems

!LEXICON XVI-Stems

!LEXICON XVII-Stems

!LEXICON XVIII-Stems


! Pronouns

LEXICON Pronouns
mimi:mimi PRON-Mimi ; ! "I"
sisi:sisi PRON-Sisi ; ! "We"
wewe:wewe PRON-Wewe ; ! "You"
nyinyi:nyiyi PRON-Nyi ; ! "You(pl)"
ninyi:ninyi PRON-Nyi ; ! "You(pl)"
yeye:yeye PRON-Yeye ; ! "He/She"
wao:wao PRON-Wao ; ! "They"


!! Verbs
